Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-349
Situs, defined.

Situs means the tax district where the motor vehicle or trailer is stored and kept for the greater portion of the calendar year. For a motor vehicle or trailer used or owned by a student, the situs is at the place of residence of the student if different from the place at which he or she is attending school.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 49.